Washington statutes.
RCW 36.165.070

Financing—Capital providers.

(1) Before a capital provider may enter into a financing agreement to provide C-PACER financing of a qualified project to a record owner of any eligible property, the capital provider must receive written consent from any holder of a lien, mortgage, or security interest in the real property that the property may participate in the program and that the C-PACER lien will take precedence over all other liens except for a lien for taxes as described in RCW 36.165.060.

(2) Before a capital provider may enter into a financing agreement to provide C-PACER financing of a qualified project to the record owner of any multifamily residential real property with five or more dwelling units, the program administrator must also receive written consent from any and all holders of affordable housing covenants, restrictions, or regulatory agreements in the real property that the property may participate in the program and that the C-PACER lien will take precedence over all other liens except for a lien for taxes as described in RCW 36.165.060.

[ 2020 c 27 s 8.]